Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
TRANSFER, LEAVE, AND DISCHARGE

§334-71 Transfer of patients between
facilities. A patient at a psychiatric facility, including those held on
court order, may be transferred to another psychiatric facility when the
administrator of the sending facility determines that it would be in the best
interest of the patient that the patient be transferred and the administrator
of the receiving facility agrees to accept the patient; provided that prior
notice of such transfer be given to the subject of such transfer and to those
persons specified in a current order of commitment. If there is no current
order of commitment, notice shall be given to those persons enumerated in
section 334-60.4. [L 1967, c 259, pt of §1; HRS §334-71; am L 1976, c 130, §5; am
L 1977, c 76, §4; am L 1985, c 68, §8]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next